California, session 20252026, AB1100.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 13951 of the Government Code is amended to read:13951. As used in this chapter, the following definitions shall apply:(a) “Board” means the California Victim Compensation Board.(b) (1) “Crime” means a crime or public offense, wherever it may take place, that would constitute a misdemeanor or a felony if the crime had been committed in California by a competent adult.(2) “Crime” includes an act of terrorism, as defined in Section 2331 of Title 18 of the United States Code, committed against a resident of the state, whether or not the act occurs within the state.(c) “Derivative victim” means an individual who sustains pecuniary loss as a result of injury or death to a victim. victim and who did not commit the crime that caused the victim’s injury or death.(d) “Law enforcement” means every district attorney, municipal police department, sheriff’s department, district attorney’s office, county probation department, and social services agency, the Department of Justice, the Department of Corrections, the Department of the Youth Authority, California Division of Juvenile Justice, the Department of the California Highway Patrol, the police department of any campus of the University of California, California State University, or community college, and every agency of the State of California expressly authorized by statute to investigate or prosecute law violators.(e) “Pecuniary loss” means an economic loss or expense resulting from an injury or death to a victim of crime that has not been and will not be reimbursed from any other source.(f) “Peer counseling” means counseling offered by a provider of mental health counseling services who has completed a specialized course in rape crisis counseling skills development, participates in continuing education in rape crisis counseling skills development, and provides rape crisis counseling within the State of California.(g) “Victim” means an individual who sustains injury or death as a direct result of an act or omission of another that is a crime as specified in subdivision (e) of Section 13955.(h) “Victim center” means a victim and witness assistance center that receives funds pursuant to Section 13835.2 of the Penal Code.(i) “Victim of violent crime advocate” has the same meaning as provided in subdivision (h) of Section 1946.7 of the Civil Code.SEC. 2. Section 13954 of the Government Code is amended to read:13954. (a) The board shall (1) (A) If the information provided to the board is insufficient to reasonably verify the application or claim by a preponderance of the evidence, the board may verify with hospitals, physicians, law enforcement officials, or other interested parties involved, the treatment of the victim or derivative victim, circumstances of the crime, amounts paid or received by or for the victim or derivative victim, and or any other pertinent information deemed necessary by the board. Verification(B) The board shall not seek nor require additional information from a third party solely to verify that a qualifying crime occurred if the board has received a valid and complete form of verification listed under subdivision (c) of Section 13956.(C) The board shall not solicit information from a law enforcement agency nor require information from a law enforcement agency if either of the following occurred:(i) The qualifying crime was not reported to a law enforcement agency, pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 13956.(ii) The victim provided a form of verification listed in subdivision (c) of Section 13956 in lieu of a police report.(D) This paragraph shall not be construed to limit the board’s ability to contact the agency, organization, court, or individual from which a form of evidence that the board has received evidencing that the crime occurred or that the injury or death resulted from the crime originates to confirm the evidence’s authenticity.(2) Verification information shall be returned to the board within 10 business days after a request for verification has been made by the board. Verification information shall be provided at no cost to the applicant, the board, or victim centers. When requesting verification information, the board shall certify that a signed authorization by the applicant is retained in the applicant’s file and that this certification constitutes actual authorization for the release of information, notwithstanding any other provision of law. If requested by a physician or mental health provider, the board shall provide a copy of the signed authorization for the release of information.(b) (1) The applicant shall cooperate with the staff of the board or the victim center in the verification of the information contained in the application. Failure to cooperate shall be reported to the board, which, in its discretion, may reject the application solely on this ground.(2) An applicant may be found to have failed to cooperate with the board if any of the following occur:(A) The applicant has information, or there is information that						he or she they may reasonably obtain, that is needed to process the application or supplemental claim, and the applicant failed to provide the information after being requested to do so by the board. The board shall take the applicant’s economic, psychosocial, and postcrime traumatic circumstances into consideration, and shall not unreasonably reject an application solely for failure to provide information.(B) The applicant provided, or caused another to provide, false information regarding the application or supplemental claim.(C) The applicant refused to apply for other benefits potentially available to him or her them from other sources besides the board board, including, but not limited to, worker’s compensation, state disability insurance, social security benefits, and unemployment insurance.(D) The applicant threatened violence or bodily harm to a member of the board or the board’s staff.(c) The board may contract with victim centers to provide verification of applications processed by the centers pursuant to conditions stated in subdivision (a). The board and its staff shall cooperate with the Office of Criminal Justice Planning and victim centers in conducting training sessions for center personnel and shall cooperate in the development of standardized verification procedures to be used by the victim centers in the state. The board and its staff shall cooperate with victim centers in disseminating standardized board policies and findings as they relate to the centers.(d) (1) Notwithstanding Section 827 of the Welfare and Institutions Code or any other provision of law, every law enforcement and social service agency in the state shall provide to the board or to victim centers that have contracts with the board pursuant to subdivision (c), upon request, a complete copy of the law enforcement report report, if available, and any supplemental reports involving the crime or incident giving rise to a claim, a copy of a petition filed in a juvenile court proceeding, reports of the probation officer, and any other document made available to the probation officer or to the judge, referee, or other hearing officer, for the specific purpose of determining the eligibility of a claim filed pursuant to this chapter.(2)  The board and victim centers receiving records pursuant to this subdivision may shall not disclose a document that personally identifies a minor to anyone other than the minor who is so identified, his or her the minor’s custodial parent or guardian, the attorneys for those parties, and any other persons that may be designated by court order. Any information received pursuant to this section shall be received in confidence for the limited purpose for which it was provided and may shall not be further disseminated. A violation of this subdivision is a misdemeanor punishable by a fine not to exceed five hundred dollars ($500).(3) The law enforcement agency supplying information pursuant to this section may withhold the names of witnesses or informants from the board, if the release of those names would be detrimental to the parties or to an investigation in progress.(e) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, every state agency, upon receipt of a copy of a release signed in accordance with the Information Practices Act of 1977 (Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 1798) of Title 1.8 of Part 4 of Division 3 of the Civil Code) by the applicant or other authorized representative, shall provide to the board or victim center center, upon request of the board or victim center, the information necessary to complete the verification of an application filed pursuant to this chapter.(f) The Department of Justice shall furnish, upon Upon application of the board, the Department of Justice shall furnish all information necessary to verify the eligibility of any applicant for benefits pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 13956, to recover any restitution fine or order obligations that are owed to the Restitution Fund or to any victim of crime, or to evaluate the status of any criminal disposition. crime.(g) A privilege is not waived under Section 912 of the Evidence Code by an applicant consenting to disclosure of an otherwise privileged communication if that disclosure is deemed necessary by the board for verification of the application.(h) Any verification conducted pursuant to this section shall be subject to the time limits specified in Section 13958.(i) Any county social worker acting as the applicant for a child victim or elder abuse victim shall not be required to provide personal identification, including, but not limited to, the applicant’s date of birth or social security number. County social workers acting in this capacity shall not be required to sign a promise of repayment to the board.SEC. 3. Section 13956 of the Government Code, as amended by Section 2 of Chapter 771 of the Statutes of 2022, is amended to read:13956.Notwithstanding Section 13955, a person shall not be eligible for compensation under the following conditions:(a)An application may be denied, in whole or in part, if the board finds that denial is appropriate because of the nature of the victim’s or other applicant’s involvement in the events leading to the crime, or the involvement of the person whose injury or death gives rise to the application.(1)Factors that may be considered in determining whether the victim or derivative victim was involved in the events leading to the qualifying crime include, but are not limited to:(A)The victim or derivative victim initiated the qualifying crime, or provoked or aggravated the suspect into initiating the qualifying crime.(B)The qualifying crime was a reasonably foreseeable consequence of the conduct of the victim or derivative victim.(C)The victim or derivative victim was committing a crime that could be charged as a felony and reasonably lead to the victim being victimized. However, committing a crime shall not be considered involvement if the victim’s injury or death occurred as a direct result of a crime committed in violation of Section 261, 273.5, or former Section 262 of, or for a crime of unlawful sexual intercourse with a minor in violation of subdivision (d) of Section 261.5 of, the Penal Code.(2)If the victim is determined to have been involved in the events leading to the qualifying crime, factors that may be considered to mitigate or overcome involvement include, but are not limited to:(A)The victim’s injuries were significantly more serious than reasonably could have been expected based on the victim’s level of involvement.(B)A third party interfered in a manner not reasonably foreseeable by the victim or derivative victim.(C)The board shall consider the victim’s age, physical condition, and psychological state, as well as any compelling health and safety concerns, in determining whether the application should be denied pursuant to this section. The application of a derivative victim of domestic violence under 18 years of age or derivative victim of trafficking under 18 years of age shall not be denied on the basis of the denial of the victim’s application under this subdivision.(b)(1)An application shall be denied if the board finds that the victim or, if compensation is sought by, or on behalf of, a derivative victim, either the victim or derivative victim failed to cooperate reasonably with a law enforcement agency in the apprehension and conviction of a criminal committing the crime. In determining whether cooperation has been reasonable, the board shall consider the victim’s or derivative victim’s age, physical condition, and psychological state, cultural or linguistic barriers, any compelling health and safety concerns, including, but not limited to, a reasonable fear of retaliation or harm that would jeopardize the well-being of the victim or the victim’s family or the derivative victim or the derivative victim’s family, and giving due consideration to the degree of cooperation of which the victim or derivative victim is capable in light of the presence of any of these factors. A victim of domestic violence shall not be determined to have failed to cooperate based on the victim’s conduct with law enforcement at the scene of the crime. Lack of cooperation shall also not be found solely because a victim of sexual assault, domestic violence, or human trafficking delayed reporting the qualifying crime.13956. (a) An application for a claim shall not be denied, in whole or in part, because of either of the following:(1) A police report was not made.(2) The crime was not reported to a law enforcement agency.(b) The board shall adopt guidelines that allow it to consider and approve applications that rely on evidence other than a police report to establish that a qualifying crime has occurred or that the injury or death on which the claim is based is a result of the qualifying crime.(c) The board shall accept any one of the following forms of evidence, without limitation, to establish that a qualifying crime occurred or that the injury or death on which the claim is based is a result of the qualifying crime:(1) Medical records documenting injuries consistent with the allegation of the qualifying crime.(2) A signed statement from a victim of violent crime advocate.(3) A permanent restraining order or protective order issued by a court to protect or separate the victim or derivative victim from the person alleged to have committed the qualifying crime.(4) A statement from a licensed medical professional, physician’s assistant, nurse practitioner, or other person licensed to provide medical or mental health care stating that the victim experienced physical, mental, or emotional injury as a result of a qualifying crime.(5) A police report or another written or oral report from a law enforcement agency.(d) A person making a statement or report regarding a qualifying crime under paragraph (2), (4), or (5) of subdivision (c) may consider any information or evidence they deem relevant.(2)(e) An application for a claim based on domestic violence shall not be denied solely because a police report was not made by the victim. The board shall adopt guidelines that allow the board to consider and approve applications for assistance based on domestic violence relying upon evidence other than a police report to establish that a domestic violence crime has occurred. Factors evidencing that a domestic violence crime has occurred may include, but are not limited to, medical records documenting injuries consistent with allegations of domestic violence, mental health records, or that the victim has obtained a permanent restraining order.(3)(f) An application for a claim based on a sexual assault shall not be denied solely because a police report was not made by the victim. The board shall adopt guidelines that allow it to consider and approve applications for assistance based on a sexual assault relying upon evidence other than a police report to establish that a sexual assault crime has occurred. Factors evidencing that a sexual assault crime has occurred may include, but are not limited to, medical records documenting injuries consistent with allegations of sexual assault, mental health records, or that the victim received a sexual assault examination.(4)(g) An application for a claim based on human trafficking as defined in Section 236.1 of the Penal Code shall not be denied solely because a police report was not made by the victim. The board shall adopt guidelines that allow the board to consider and approve applications for assistance based on human trafficking relying upon evidence other than a police report to establish that a human trafficking crime has occurred. That evidence may include any reliable corroborating information approved by the board, including, but not limited to, the following:(A)(1) A Law Enforcement Agency Endorsement issued pursuant to Section 236.5 of the Penal Code.(B)(2) A human trafficking caseworker, as identified in Section 1038.2 of the Evidence Code, has attested by affidavit that the individual was a victim of human trafficking.(5)(A)(h) (1) An application for a claim by a military personnel victim based on a sexual assault by another military personnel shall not be denied solely because it was not reported to a superior officer or law enforcement at the time of the crime.(B)(2) Factors that the board shall consider for purposes of determining if a claim qualifies for compensation include, but are not limited to, the evidence of the following:(i)(A) Restricted or unrestricted reports to a military victim advocate, sexual assault response coordinator, chaplain, attorney, or other military personnel.(ii)(B) Medical or physical evidence consistent with sexual assault.(iii)(C) A written or oral report from military law enforcement or a civilian law enforcement agency concluding that a sexual assault crime was committed against the victim.(iv)(D) A letter or other written statement from a sexual assault counselor, as defined in Section 1035.2 of the Evidence Code, licensed therapist, or mental health counselor, stating that the victim is seeking services related to the allegation of sexual assault.(v)(E) A credible witness to whom the victim disclosed the details that a sexual assault crime occurred.(vi)(F) A restraining order from a military or civilian court against the perpetrator of the sexual assault.(vii)(G) Other behavior by the victim consistent with sexual assault.(C)(3) For purposes of this subdivision, the sexual assault at issue shall have occurred during military service, including deployment.(D)(4) For purposes of this subdivision, the sexual assault may have been committed off base.(E)(5) For purposes of this subdivision, a “perpetrator” means an individual who is any of the following at the time of the sexual assault:(i)(A) An active duty military personnel from the United States Army, Navy, Marine Corps, Air Force, or Coast Guard.(ii)(B) A civilian employee of any military branch specified in clause (i), military base, or military deployment.(iii)(C) A contractor or agent of a private military or private security company.(iv)(D) A member of the California National Guard.(F)(6) For purposes of this subdivision, “sexual assault” means an offense included in Section 261, 264.1, 286, 287, formerly 288a, or Section 289 of the Penal Code, as of January 1, 2015.(i) The board shall provide educational materials regarding how victims may contact and cooperate with law enforcement to applicants upon request. The board shall include in these materials contact information for service providers that are available to help the victim or claimant contact law enforcement and information about victim rights regarding participation in an investigation or prosecution.(j) The board shall not deny an application, in whole or in part, based on a lack of cooperation by a victim, derivative victim, or applicant with a law enforcement agency.(c) (1)Notwithstanding Section 13955, a person who is convicted of a violent felony listed in subdivision (c) of Section 667.5 of the Penal Code shall not be granted compensation until that person has been discharged from probation or has been released from a correctional institution and has been discharged from parole, or has been discharged from postrelease community supervision or mandatory supervision, if any, for that violent crime. Compensation(k) (1) Compensation shall not be granted to an applicant pursuant to this chapter during any period of time the applicant is held in a correctional institution or while an applicant is required to register as a sex offender pursuant to Section 290 of the Penal Code. institution.(2) A person who has been convicted of a violent felony listed in subdivision (c) of Section 667.5 of the Penal Code is held in a correctional institution may apply for compensation pursuant to this chapter at any time, but the award of that compensation may not be considered until the applicant meets the requirements for compensation set forth in paragraph (1).(d)(1)This section shall become inoperative on July 1, 2024, only if General Fund moneys over the multiyear forecasts beginning in the 2024–25 fiscal year are available to support ongoing augmentations and actions, and if an appropriation is made to backfill the Restitution Fund to support the actions in this section. If those conditions are met, this section is repealed January 1, 2025.(2)The amendments made by the act adding this subdivision shall become operative on January 1, 2023.SEC. 4. Section 13956 of the Government Code, as added by Section 3 of Chapter 771 of the Statutes of 2022, is repealed.13956.Notwithstanding Section 13955, a person shall not be eligible for compensation under the following conditions:(a)An application may be denied, in whole or in part, if the board finds that denial is appropriate because of the nature of the victim’s or other applicant’s involvement in the events leading to the crime, or the involvement of the person whose injury or death gives rise to the application.(1)Factors that may be considered in determining whether the victim or derivative victim was involved in the events leading to the qualifying crime include, but are not limited to:(A)The victim or derivative victim initiated the qualifying crime, or provoked or aggravated the suspect into initiating the qualifying crime.(B)The qualifying crime was a reasonably foreseeable consequence of the conduct of the victim or derivative victim.(C)The victim or derivative victim was committing a crime that could be charged as a felony and reasonably lead to the victim being victimized. However, committing a crime shall not be considered involvement if the victim’s injury or death occurred as a direct result of a crime committed in violation of Section 261, 273.5, or former Section 262 of, or for a crime of unlawful sexual intercourse with a minor in violation of subdivision (d) of Section 261.5 of, the Penal Code.(2)If the victim is determined to have been involved in the events leading to the qualifying crime, factors that may be considered to mitigate or overcome involvement include, but are not limited to:(A)The victim’s injuries were significantly more serious than reasonably could have been expected based on the victim’s level of involvement.(B)A third party interfered in a manner not reasonably foreseeable by the victim or derivative victim.(C)The board shall consider the victim’s age, physical condition, and psychological state, as well as any compelling health and safety concerns, in determining whether the application should be denied pursuant to this section. The application of a derivative victim of domestic violence under 18 years of age or derivative victim of trafficking under 18 years of age shall not be denied on the basis of the denial of the victim’s application under this subdivision.(b)(1)An application shall be denied if the board finds that the victim or, if compensation is sought by, or on behalf of, a derivative victim, either the victim or derivative victim failed to cooperate reasonably with a law enforcement agency in the apprehension and conviction of a criminal committing the crime. In determining whether cooperation has been reasonable, the board shall consider the victim’s or derivative victim’s age, physical condition, and psychological state, cultural or linguistic barriers, any compelling health and safety concerns, including, but not limited to, a reasonable fear of retaliation or harm that would jeopardize the well-being of the victim or the victim’s family or the derivative victim or the derivative victim’s family, and giving due consideration to the degree of cooperation of which the victim or derivative victim is capable in light of the presence of any of these factors. A victim shall not be determined to have failed to cooperate based on the victim’s conduct with law enforcement at the scene of the crime. Lack of cooperation shall also not be found solely because a victim delayed reporting the qualifying crime.(2)An application for a claim based on domestic violence shall not be denied solely because a police report was not made by the victim. The board shall adopt guidelines that allow the board to consider and approve applications for assistance based on domestic violence relying upon evidence other than a police report to establish that a domestic violence crime has occurred. Factors evidencing that a domestic violence crime has occurred may include, but are not limited to, medical records documenting injuries consistent with allegations of domestic violence, mental health records, or that the victim has obtained a permanent restraining order.(3)An application for a claim based on a sexual assault shall not be denied solely because a police report was not made by the victim. The board shall adopt guidelines that allow it to consider and approve applications for assistance based on a sexual assault relying upon evidence other than a police report to establish that a sexual assault crime has occurred. Factors evidencing that a sexual assault crime has occurred may include, but are not limited to, medical records documenting injuries consistent with allegations of sexual assault, mental health records, or that the victim received a sexual assault examination.(4)An application for a claim based on human trafficking as defined in Section 236.1 of the Penal Code shall not be denied solely because a police report was not made by the victim. The board shall adopt guidelines that allow the board to consider and approve applications for assistance based on human trafficking relying upon evidence other than a police report to establish that a human trafficking crime has occurred. That evidence may include any reliable corroborating information approved by the board, including, but not limited to, the following:(A)A Law Enforcement Agency Endorsement issued pursuant to Section 236.5 of the Penal Code.(B)A human trafficking caseworker, as identified in Section 1038.2 of the Evidence Code, has attested by affidavit that the individual was a victim of human trafficking.(5)(A) An application for a claim by a military personnel victim based on a sexual assault by another military personnel shall not be denied solely because it was not reported to a superior officer or law enforcement at the time of the crime.(B)Factors that the board shall consider for purposes of determining if a claim qualifies for compensation include, but are not limited to, the evidence of the following:(i)Restricted or unrestricted reports to a military victim advocate, sexual assault response coordinator, chaplain, attorney, or other military personnel.(ii)Medical or physical evidence consistent with sexual assault.(iii)A written or oral report from military law enforcement or a civilian law enforcement agency concluding that a sexual assault crime was committed against the victim.(iv)A letter or other written statement from a sexual assault counselor, as defined in Section 1035.2 of the Evidence Code, licensed therapist, or mental health counselor, stating that the victim is seeking services related to the allegation of sexual assault.(v)A credible witness to whom the victim disclosed the details that a sexual assault crime occurred.(vi)A restraining order from a military or civilian court against the perpetrator of the sexual assault.(vii)Other behavior by the victim consistent with sexual assault.(C)For purposes of this subdivision, the sexual assault at issue shall have occurred during military service, including deployment.(D)For purposes of this subdivision, the sexual assault may have been committed off base.(E)For purposes of this subdivision, a “perpetrator” means an individual who is any of the following at the time of the sexual assault:(i)An active duty military personnel from the United States Army, Navy, Marine Corps, Air Force, or Coast Guard.(ii)A civilian employee of any military branch specified in clause (i), military base, or military deployment.(iii)A contractor or agent of a private military or private security company.(iv)A member of the California National Guard.(F)For purposes of this subdivision, “sexual assault” means an offense included in Section 261, 264.1, 286, 287, formerly 288a, or Section 289 of the Penal Code, as of January 1, 2015.(c)(1)Notwithstanding Section 13955, a person who is convicted of a violent felony listed in subdivision (c) of Section 667.5 of the Penal Code shall not be granted compensation until that person has been released from a correctional institution. Compensation shall not be granted to an applicant pursuant to this chapter during any period of time the applicant is held in a correctional institution or while an applicant is required to register as a sex offender pursuant to Section 290 of the Penal Code.(2)A person who has been convicted of a violent felony listed in subdivision (c) of Section 667.5 of the Penal Code may apply for compensation pursuant to this chapter at any time, but the award of that compensation may not be considered until the applicant meets the requirements for compensation set forth in paragraph (1).(d)This section shall become operative on July 1, 2024, only if General Fund moneys over the multiyear forecasts beginning in the 2024–25 fiscal year are available to support ongoing augmentations and actions, and if an appropriation is made to backfill the Restitution Fund to support the actions in this section.SEC. 5. Section 13957.5 of the Government Code, as amended by Section 6 of Chapter 771 of the Statutes of 2022, is repealed.13957.5.(a)In authorizing compensation for loss of income and support pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 13957, the board may take any of the following actions:(1)Compensate the victim for loss of income directly resulting from the injury, except that loss of income may not be paid by the board for more than five years following the crime, unless the victim is disabled as defined in Section 416(i) of Title 42 of the United States Code, as a direct result of the injury.(2)Compensate an adult derivative victim for loss of income, subject to all of the following:(A)The derivative victim is the parent or legal guardian of a victim, who at the time of the crime was under 18 years of age and is hospitalized as a direct result of the crime.(B)The minor victim’s treating physician certifies in writing that the presence of the victim’s parent or legal guardian at the hospital is necessary for the treatment of the victim.(C)Reimbursement for loss of income under this paragraph may not exceed the total value of the income that would have been earned by the adult derivative victim during a 30-day period.(3)Compensate an adult derivative victim for loss of income, subject to all of the following:(A)The derivative victim is the parent or legal guardian of a victim who at the time of the crime was under 18 years of age.(B)The victim died as a direct result of the crime.(C)The board shall pay for loss of income under this paragraph for not more than 30 calendar days from the date of the victim’s death.(4)Compensate a derivative victim who was legally dependent on the victim at the time of the crime for the loss of support incurred by that person as a direct result of the crime, subject to both of the following:(A)Loss of support shall be paid by the board for income lost by an adult for a period up to, but not more than, five years following the date of the crime.(B)Loss of support shall not be paid by the board on behalf of a minor for a period beyond the child’s attaining 18 years of age.(5)(A)If the qualifying crime is a violation of Section 236.1 of the Penal Code, and the victim has not been and will not be compensated from any other source, compensate the victim for loss of income or support directly resulting from the deprivation of liberty during the crime based upon the value of the victim’s labor as guaranteed under California law at the time that the services were performed for the number of hours that the services were performed, for up to 40 hours per week.(B)On or before July 1, 2020, the board shall adopt guidelines that allow it to rely on evidence other than official employment documentation in considering and approving an application for that compensation. The evidence may include any reliable corroborating information approved by the board, including, but not limited to, a statement under penalty of perjury from the applicant, a human trafficking caseworker as defined in Section 1038.2 of the Evidence Code, a licensed attorney, or a witness to the circumstances of the crime.(C)Compensation for loss of income paid by the board pursuant to this paragraph shall not exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000) per year that the services were performed, for a maximum of two years.(D)If the victim is a minor at the time of application, the board shall distribute payment under this paragraph when the minor reaches 18 years of age.(b)The total amount payable to all derivative victims pursuant to this section as the result of one crime shall not exceed seventy thousand dollars ($70,000).(c)(1)This section shall become inoperative on July 1, 2024, only if General Fund moneys over the multiyear forecasts beginning in the 2024–25 fiscal year are available to support ongoing augmentations and actions, and if an appropriation is made to backfill the Restitution Fund to support the actions in this section. If those conditions are met, this section is repealed January 1, 2025.(2)The amendments made by the act adding this subdivision shall become operative on January 1, 2023.SEC. 6. Section 13957.5 of the Government Code, as added by Section 7 of Chapter 771 of the Statutes of 2022, is amended to read:13957.5. (a) In authorizing compensation for loss of income and support pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 13957, the board may take any of the following actions:(1) Subject to paragraph (7), (6), and calculated as provided in paragraph (8), (7), compensate the victim for loss of income directly resulting from the injury, except that loss of income shall not be paid by the board for more than five years following the crime, unless the victim is disabled as defined in Section 416(i) of Title 42 of the United States Code, as a direct result of the injury.(2) Compensate an adult derivative victim for loss of income, subject to all of the following:(A) The derivative victim is the parent, legal guardian, or spouse of the victim, or if no parent, legal guardian, or spouse of the victim is present at the hospital, is another derivative victim, who is present at the hospital during the period the victim parent or legal guardian of a victim who at the time of the crime was under 18 years of age and is hospitalized as a direct result of the crime.(B) The victim’s treating physician certifies in writing that the presence of the derivative victim at the hospital is reasonably necessary for the treatment of the victim, or is reasonably necessary for the victim’s psychological well-being.(C) Reimbursement for loss of income under this paragraph shall not exceed the total value of the income that would have been earned, calculated as described in paragraph (8), (7), by the adult derivative victim during a 30-day period.(3) Compensate an adult derivative victim for loss of income, subject to all of the following:(A)The victim died as a direct result of the crime.(B)(i)If the derivative victim is the spouse of the victim, is the parent of the victim, was living in the household of the victim at the time of the crime, was the legal guardian of the victim at the time of the crime, or was the legal guardian of the victim when the victim was under 18 years of age, the board shall pay for loss of income under this paragraph, calculated as provided by paragraph (8), for not more than 30 calendar days occurring within 90 calendar days of the victim’s death.(ii)For a derivative victim not included in clause (i), the board shall pay for loss of income under this paragraph, calculated as provided by paragraph (8), for not more than seven calendar days occurring within 90 calendar days of the victim’s death.(A) The derivative victim is the parent or legal guardian of a victim who at the time of the crime was under 18 years of age.(B) The victim died as a direct result of the crime.(C) The board shall pay for loss of income under this paragraph, calculated as provided by paragraph (7), for not more than 30 calendar days from the date of the victim’s death.(4) Compensate a derivative victim who was legally dependent on the victim at the time of the crime for the loss of support incurred by that person as a direct result of the crime, calculated as provided in paragraph (8), (7), subject to both of the following:(A) Loss of support shall be paid by the board for income lost by an adult for a period up to, but not more than, five years following the date of the crime.(B) Loss of support shall not be paid by the board on behalf of a minor for a period beyond the child’s attaining 18 years of age.(5) (A)    If the qualifying crime is a violation of Section 236.1 of the Penal Code, and the victim has not been and will not be compensated from any other source, compensate the victim for loss of income or support directly resulting from the deprivation of liberty during the crime based upon the value of the victim’s labor as guaranteed under California law at the time that the services were performed for the number of hours that the services were performed, for up to 40 hours per week.(B) On or before July 1, 2020, the board shall adopt guidelines that allow it to rely on evidence other than official employment documentation in considering and approving an application for that compensation. The evidence may include any reliable corroborating information approved by the board, including, but not limited to, a statement under penalty of perjury from the applicant, a human trafficking caseworker as defined in Section 1038.2 of the Evidence Code, a licensed attorney, or a witness to the circumstances of the crime.(C) Compensation for loss of income paid by the board pursuant to this paragraph shall not exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000) per year that the services were performed, for a maximum of two years.(D) If the victim is a minor at the time of application, the board shall distribute payment under this paragraph when the minor reaches 18 years of age.(6)If the victim is a minor at the time of the crime, the victim shall be eligible for future loss of income due to disability from future employment directly resulting from the injury at a rate an employee would earn if employed for 35 hours per week at the minimum wage required at the time of the crime by Section 1182.12 of the Labor Code for a maximum of one year.(7)(6) (A) A victim or derivative victim who is otherwise eligible for loss of income under paragraph (1), (2), or (3) shall be eligible for loss of income if they were employed employed, including self-employed, or were receiving earned income benefits at the time of the crime. If an otherwise eligible adult victim or derivative victim was not employed or receiving earned income benefits at the time of the crime, they shall be eligible for loss of income under paragraph (1), (2), or (3) if the victim or derivative victim was fully or partially employed or receiving income benefits for a total of at least two weeks in the 12 months preceding the qualifying crime, or either of the following occurred:(i) They earned income or received earned income benefits either in the tax year preceding the year the crime occurred or in the tax year the crime occurred, and the amount of income earned or earned income benefits received in the applicable tax year totaled at least one thousand three hundred twenty dollars ($1,320).(ii) They had an offer of employment at the time of the crime and was unable to begin employment as a result of the crime.(B) A derivative victim who is otherwise eligible for loss of support under paragraph (4) shall be eligible for loss of support if the victim was employed employed, including self-employed, or was receiving earned income benefits at the time of the crime. If the victim was not employed or receiving earned income benefits at the time of the crime, the derivative victim shall be eligible if the victim was fully or partially employed or receiving earned income benefits for a total of at least two weeks in the 12 months preceding the qualifying crime, or if the either of the following occurred:(i) The victim earned income or received earned income benefits either in the tax year preceding the year the crime occurred or in the tax year the crime occurred, and the amount of income earned or earned income benefits received in the applicable tax year totaled at least one thousand three hundred twenty dollars ($1,320).(ii) The victim had an offer of employment at the time of the crime and was unable to begin employment as a result of the crime.(8)(A)Except as provided by subparagraph (B), loss(7) Loss of income or support under paragraph (1), (2), (3), or (4) shall be based on the actual loss the victim or derivative victim, as applicable, sustains or the wages the victim or derivative victim, as applicable, would have earned if employed for 35 hours per week at the minimum wage required by Section 1182.12 of the Labor Code during the applicable period, period for which loss of income or support is being claimed, whichever is greater.(B)For victims who are under 18 years of age at the time of the crime, loss of income under paragraph (1) shall be based upon the actual loss the victim sustains.(b)By July 1, 2025, the board shall adopt new guidelines for accepting evidence that may be available to the victim or derivative victim in considering and approving a claim for loss of income or support under this section, which shall require the board to accept any form of reliable corroborating information approved by the board regarding the victim or derivative victim’s income, including, but not limited to, all of the following:(1)A statement from the employer.(2)A pattern of deposits into a bank or credit union account of the victim or derivative victim.(3)Pay stubs or copies of checks received as payment.(4)A copy of a job offer letter from an employer.(5)Income tax records.(6)Verification through a vendor, if the employer contracts with a vendor for employment verification.(7)Information related to eligibility or enrollment from any of the following:(A)The CalFresh program pursuant to Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 18900) of Part 6 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institution Code.(B)The CalWORKs program.(C)The state’s children’s health insurance program under Title XXI of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1397aa et seq.).(D)The California Health Benefit Exchange established pursuant to Title 22 (commencing with Section 100500) of the Government Code.(E)The electronic service established in accordance with Section 435.949 of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations.(F)Records from the Employment Development Department.(c)(b) The total amount payable to all derivative victims pursuant to this section as the result of one crime shall not exceed one hundred seventy thousand dollars ($100,000). ($70,000).(d)This section shall become operative on July 1, 2024, only if General Fund moneys over the multiyear forecasts beginning in the 2024–25 fiscal year are available to support ongoing augmentations and actions, and if an appropriation is made to backfill the Restitution Fund to support the actions in this section.SECTION 1.Section 11006 of the Penal Code is amended to read:11006.(a)The Attorney General shall appoint agents and other employees as the Attorney General deems necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter.(b)All persons employed after July 1, 1973, within the Department of Justice designated as peace officers and performing investigative duties shall be required by the department to obtain a certificate from the Commission on Peace Officer Standards and Training.